Utah statutes.
61-2f-504.   Use of money.
(1)  Money accumulated in the fund in excess of $100,000 shall be set aside
and segregated to be used by the division to:
(a)  investigate violations of this chapter related to fraud,
misrepresentation, or deceit; and
(b)  advance education and research in the field of real estate.
(2)  The division may use the money described in Subsection (1) only in a
manner consistent with Subsection (1), including for a course:
(a)  sponsored by the division;
(b)  offered by the division in conjunction with any university or college in
the state; or
(c)  provided for by contracting for a particular research project in the
field of real estate for the state.
